Indiana, session 2026, HB1391.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-21-8-60 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 60. (a) A person who knowingly or intentionally
violates section 59(a) of this chapter commits a Level 5 felony if the
violation is the proximate cause of serious bodily injury to another
person.
(b) The offense described in subsection (a) is a Level 4 felony if
the person has a previous infraction under section 59(a) of this
chapter in the five (5) years preceding the violation of subsection
(a).
(c) A person who violates subsection (a) commits a separate
offense for each person whose injury is caused by the violation of
subsection (a).
SECTION 2. IC 35-52-9.1-20.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20.2. IC 9-21-8-60 defines a crime
concerning traffic regulation.
2026 IN 1391—LS 6806/DI 137